Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Chapter 37. Elected Public Officers Retirement System.

Cross references. —

For alternate benefits for certain EPORS members, see AS

39.35.389

; for adoption of regulations relating to former AS 39.37, see § 4, ch. 35, SLA 1984 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for required notice regarding medical benefits under former AS 39.37.145, see § 4, ch. 14, SLA 1992 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for provisions concerning qualified domestic relations orders, taxation, assignment, execution, transfer, insurance, and related matters under the elected public officers retirement system, see sec. 58, ch. 68, SLA 2000, in the 2000 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For elected public officers retirement system, see 2 AAC 37, art. 2.

Editor’s notes. —

Chapter 205, SLA 1975, which added this chapter, was submitted to the voters by referendum and was rejected.
The rejected chapter was amended by § 8, ch. 218, SLA 1976; § 2, ch. 254, SLA 1976; § 3, ch. 245, SLA 1976.

In State v. Allen, Sup. Ct. Op. No. 2278, 625 P.2d 844 (1981), the supreme court held that all elected officials who were participating in the elected public officers retirement system at the time the repeal became effective [October 14, 1976], are entitled to the benefits provided by that system upon retirement.

The provisions of this chapter read as follows:

“Sec. 39.37.010.
Application.

This chapter applies to persons who are elected public officers on January 1, 1976 and to persons who become elected public officers after January 1, 1976. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.020.
Retirement of elected public officers.

An elected public officer is eligible for retirement pay if he has had five or more years of service at the time of retirement as an elected public officer.
(§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.030.
Retirement for incapacity.

An elected public officer who has served for a period of five years, and who believes that he has become so incapacitated as to prevent him from efficiently performing his duties, may file a written application for retirement which contains a sworn statement of his service and of his incapacity.
When an application is filed, a board of three persons to inquire into the circumstances shall be appointed by the chief justice of the state supreme court, and the commissioner of administration upon the board’s recommendation shall retire the elected public officer.
The effective date of the retirement shall be the first day of the month following the recommendation of the board.
(§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.040.
Voluntary retirement.

(a) An elected public officer may voluntarily retire at any time and shall have a vested right to his accrued retirement pay if he has served five years or more.
Retirement pay shall not begin until he has reached age 60, except that an actuarially equivalent retirement pay may be begun after he has reached age 55 or upon attaining 20 years of creditable service.
The provisions of
AS 39.37.030 are an exception to this rule.

“Sec. 39.37.050.
Benefit formula.

(a) A person retired under the provisions of this chapter shall receive from the effective date of his retirement until his death monthly compensation equal to a percent of either (1) the monthly salary and additional allowances established under
AS

24.10.110

authorized for the office from which he retired at the time each retirement payment is made; or (2) his average monthly compensation as defined in
AS

39.35.680

.
At the time the official applies for retirement, he shall elect to have his benefits computed under either (1) or (2) of this subsection. The election is irrevocable.

“Sec. 39.37.060.
Survivors’ benefits.

(a) Upon the death of an elected public officer who has served at least two years, the surviving spouse is entitled to receive monthly compensation equal to one-half of the monthly retirement pay the elected public officer would thereafter have been entitled to receive if retired at the time of death.
If at death the elected public officer was not yet entitled to retirement pay, or was or would have been entitled to less than 60 percent of the monthly salary authorized for his office, the surviving spouse is entitled to monthly compensation equal to 30 percent of the monthly salary authorized for the office at the time each retirement payment is made or 30 percent of his average monthly compensation as defined in
AS

39.35.680

.

“Sec. 39.37.070.
Contributions.

(a) Each elected public officer shall contribute seven percent of his compensation to the retirement system.

“Sec. 39.37.080.
Administration.

The commissioner of administration is responsible for the administration of the system.
(§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.090.
Regulations.

The commissioner may promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter.
Regulations adopted by the commissioner under this chapter relate to the internal management of state agencies and their adoption is not subject to the Administrative Procedure Act ( AS 44.62).
(§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.100.
Tax exemption.

Benefits paid under this chapter are exempt from state and municipal taxes. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.110.
Appropriations.

An estimated amount sufficient to pay all benefits, including interest credited to individual accounts, anticipated to be paid under this chapter in each fiscal year shall be included in the annual appropriation to the Department of Administration.
If the actual authorized benefits necessary to be paid in any fiscal year exceed the sum appropriated, the benefits due shall nevertheless be paid from general funds of the state not otherwise appropriated.
(§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.120.
Accounting.

(a) The elected public officers retirement account shall be established to which all appropriations under this chapter shall be credited.

“Sec. 39.37.130.
Refunds.

Upon termination of creditable service, application may be made for a refund of the balance in the individual’s account.
Upon withdrawal of the balance, all rights to benefits terminate.
(§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.140.
Prior service credit.

In the event an elected public officer who has withdrawn the balance of his individual account returns to elected public office, he shall receive credit for his prior period or periods of service only if he repays within one year of the date of return all refunded contributions with interest at the prevailing prescribed rate. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.145.
Medical benefits.

Each person who is entitled to receive a monthly benefit from the retirement system under this chapter shall be provided with major medical insurance coverage.
Coverage shall become effective on the same date as retirement benefits commence and cease when the retired employee or survivor is no longer eligible to receive a monthly benefit. The level of coverage for persons over age 65 shall be the same as that available before reaching age 65 except that the benefits payable shall be supplemental to those afforded under the federal Old Age Survivor and Disability Insurance Program, if any.
(§ 3 ch 245 SLA 1976)

“Sec. 39.37.150.
Definitions.

In this chapter

“(3) ‘membership service’ means service as an elected public officer.
(§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)”

Section 51, ch. 117, SLA 1986, provides:
“Notwithstanding former AS 39.37.060(b), the surviving spouse of an elected public officer who has retirement rights under the Elected Public Officers Retirement System is eligible for survivors’ benefits under former AS 39.37.060 if the surviving spouse was married to the elected public officer for at least one year immediately preceding the death of the elected public officer. The benefits continue until the remarriage or death of the surviving spouse.”

Section 5, ch. 89, SLA 1988 provides:
“Notwithstanding former AS 39.37.130 and 39.37.140, a former member of the Elected Public Officers Retirement System who received an involuntary refund of the individual’s account because of a levy may repay the amount levied together with accrued interest.
Upon payment of the full amount owing, the former member regains all rights that were terminated because of the refund.”

“Sec. 39.37.010. Application.

This chapter applies to persons who are elected public officers on January 1, 1976 and to persons who become elected public officers after January 1, 1976. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.020. Retirement of elected public officers.

An elected public officer is eligible for retirement pay if he has had five or more years of service at the time of retirement as an elected public officer. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.030. Retirement for incapacity.

An elected public officer who has served for a period of five years, and who believes that he has become so incapacitated as to prevent him from efficiently performing his duties, may file a written application for retirement which contains a sworn statement of his service and of his incapacity. When an application is filed, a board of three persons to inquire into the circumstances shall be appointed by the chief justice of the state supreme court, and the commissioner of administration upon the board’s recommendation shall retire the elected public officer. The effective date of the retirement shall be the first day of the month following the recommendation of the board. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.040. Voluntary retirement.

(a) An elected public officer may voluntarily retire at any time and shall have a vested right to his accrued retirement pay if he has served five years or more. Retirement pay shall not begin until he has reached age 60, except that an actuarially equivalent retirement pay may be begun after he has reached age 55 or upon attaining 20 years of creditable service. The provisions of AS 39.37.030 are an exception to this rule.

“(b) An elected public officer desiring to retire under this section shall file with the commissioner of administration an application for retirement.

“(c) If an elected public officer is eligible to receive retirement pay at the time of his retirement, his retirement pay shall begin on the first day of the month following termination of office. If an elected public officer is not eligible to receive retirement pay at the time of his retirement, his retirement pay shall begin on the first day of the month he reaches age 60 or at age 55 with an actuarially reduced benefit. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975; am § 8 ch 218 SLA 1976)

“Sec. 39.37.050. Benefit formula.

(a) A person retired under the provisions of this chapter shall receive from the effective date of his retirement until his death monthly compensation equal to a percent of either (1) the monthly salary and additional allowances established under AS

24.10.110

authorized for the office from which he retired at the time each retirement payment is made; or (2) his average monthly compensation as defined in AS

39.35.680

. At the time the official applies for retirement, he shall elect to have his benefits computed under either (1) or (2) of this subsection. The election is irrevocable.

“(b) The percent shall be five percent per year of membership service and the percent per year of other creditable service equal to the benefit formula used for years of creditable service under AS 39.35 prevailing at the time of retirement.

“(c) The total percentage under (b) of this section shall not exceed 75 percent. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.060. Survivors’ benefits.

(a) Upon the death of an elected public officer who has served at least two years, the surviving spouse is entitled to receive monthly compensation equal to one-half of the monthly retirement pay the elected public officer would thereafter have been entitled to receive if retired at the time of death. If at death the elected public officer was not yet entitled to retirement pay, or was or would have been entitled to less than 60 percent of the monthly salary authorized for his office, the surviving spouse is entitled to monthly compensation equal to 30 percent of the monthly salary authorized for the office at the time each retirement payment is made or 30 percent of his average monthly compensation as defined in AS

39.35.680

.

“(b) To be eligible for the survivors’ benefits, the surviving spouse must have been married to the elected public officer for at least two years immediately preceding the death of the elected public officer. The benefits continue until the remarriage or death of the surviving spouse.

“(c) If there is no surviving spouse, or if the surviving spouse does not meet the requirements of (b) of this section, or upon the remarriage or death of the surviving spouse, the surviving dependent child or children of the elected public officer are entitled to receive in equal shares 50 percent of the amount of the survivors’ benefits specified under (a) of this section.

“(d) The surviving child or children are entitled to the survivors’ benefits under (c) of this section during the period of their dependency. Dependency exists with respect to any child of an elected public officer who is either (1) a minor under the laws of Alaska; (2) under the age of 23 and is a student attending on a full-time basis an accredited educational or technical institution recognized by the Department of Education; or (3) so mentally or physically incapacitated as to be unable to provide for self-care.

“(e) If there are both an eligible surviving spouse and surviving dependent children, but who reside in separate households, the surviving spouse will receive one-half of the benefits payable under (a) of this section and the dependent children will share equally in the remainder of the benefits.

“(f) Upon the death of an elected public officer who has served at least two years, if the death occurred after June 28, 1975 but before January 1, 1976, the surviving spouse is entitled to the benefits provided in this chapter including the benefits which would have accrued under this section had the elected public officer died after January 1, 1976. If the elected public officer would have been entitled, before the expiration of the term to which he was elected, to service credit by complying with the provisions of AS 39.37.070, the surviving spouse is entitled to that service credit if any payments required under this section are made before the date on which the term would have expired. If this payment is made, the benefits are in addition to the benefits provided in this section. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 254 SLA 1976)

“Sec. 39.37.070. Contributions.

(a) Each elected public officer shall contribute seven percent of his compensation to the retirement system.

“(b) An elected public officer participating in the retirement system established under this chapter is entitled to service credit for creditable service to the state, territory, or political subdivision before January 1, 1976 for each year of such service for which he has accrued service credit under AS 39.35.

“(c) An elected public officer participating in the retirement system established under this chapter may become entitled to service credit for creditable service to the state, territory or political subdivision before January 1, 1976 for which he has not accrued service credit under AS 39.35 by complying with the following:

“(1) if the prior creditable service was covered under AS 39.35 at the time it was rendered, he shall pay contributions for each year of seven percent of the compensation received at the time service was rendered; or

“(2) if the prior creditable service was not covered under AS 39.35 at the time service was rendered, he shall pay contributions of seven percent of his compensation at the time he makes application under (d) of this section; or

“(3) if the service was as an elected public officer, he shall pay contributions at the rate of seven percent of the amount of salary actually paid during the period.

“(d) To receive service credit under (c) of this section, an elected public officer must make application within 60 days of becoming a participant in the retirement system established under this chapter.

“(e) Each public officer who has accrued five years or more of membership service shall contribute to the retirement system seven percent of compensation received thereafter for all creditable service and is entitled to benefits as provided in this chapter.

“(f) The compensation applicable to a member of the legislature making a contribution under (a) of this section is the sum of the legislative salary and additional allowances established under AS

24.10.100

and

24.10.110

.

“(g) The contribution is made in the form of a payroll deduction and is made notwithstanding that the compensation paid in cash to the elected public officer is reduced below the minimum prescribed by law. Each elected public officer is considered to consent to the deduction made from his compensation. Payment of compensation less the deduction prescribed in (a) of this section and other payroll deductions constitutes a full and complete discharge and satisfaction of all claims and demands for the services rendered by him during the period covered by the payment, except as to the benefits provided for under this chapter. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.080. Administration.

The commissioner of administration is responsible for the administration of the system. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.090. Regulations.

The commissioner may promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter. Regulations adopted by the commissioner under this chapter relate to the internal management of state agencies and their adoption is not subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62). (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.100. Tax exemption.

Benefits paid under this chapter are exempt from state and municipal taxes. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.110. Appropriations.

An estimated amount sufficient to pay all benefits, including interest credited to individual accounts, anticipated to be paid under this chapter in each fiscal year shall be included in the annual appropriation to the Department of Administration. If the actual authorized benefits necessary to be paid in any fiscal year exceed the sum appropriated, the benefits due shall nevertheless be paid from general funds of the state not otherwise appropriated. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.120. Accounting.

(a) The elected public officers retirement account shall be established to which all appropriations under this chapter shall be credited.

“(b) An individual account shall be maintained for each elected public officer to which the amount of his mandatory contributions collected under this chapter shall be credited as of the date of deduction or payment, as the case may be. As of the last day of each calendar year and each fiscal year beginning with June 30, 1976, this account shall be credited with interest by applying one-half of the prescribed rate of interest to the balance in the account as of that date.

“(c) Upon commencement of retirement pay to an elected public officer, the balance in his individual account shall be transferred to the elected public officers retirement account.

“(d) Upon commencement of participation in this retirement system, any balance in an elected public officer’s individual account under AS 39.35 is transferred to his individual account under this section. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.130. Refunds.

Upon termination of creditable service, application may be made for a refund of the balance in the individual’s account. Upon withdrawal of the balance, all rights to benefits terminate. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.140. Prior service credit.

In the event an elected public officer who has withdrawn the balance of his individual account returns to elected public office, he shall receive credit for his prior period or periods of service only if he repays within one year of the date of return all refunded contributions with interest at the prevailing prescribed rate. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)

“Sec. 39.37.145. Medical benefits.

Each person who is entitled to receive a monthly benefit from the retirement system under this chapter shall be provided with major medical insurance coverage. Coverage shall become effective on the same date as retirement benefits commence and cease when the retired employee or survivor is no longer eligible to receive a monthly benefit. The level of coverage for persons over age 65 shall be the same as that available before reaching age 65 except that the benefits payable shall be supplemental to those afforded under the federal Old Age Survivor and Disability Insurance Program, if any. (§ 3 ch 245 SLA 1976)

“Sec. 39.37.150. Definitions.

In this chapter

“(1) ‘elected public officer’ means the governor, lieutenant governor, or a member of the legislature;

“(2) ‘creditable service’ means service as an elected public officer and other service to the state, territory, or political subdivision under which benefits presently accrue under AS 39.35;

“(3) ‘membership service’ means service as an elected public officer. (§ 8 ch 205 SLA 1975)”

Section 51, ch. 117, SLA 1986, provides: “Notwithstanding former AS 39.37.060(b), the surviving spouse of an elected public officer who has retirement rights under the Elected Public Officers Retirement System is eligible for survivors’ benefits under former AS 39.37.060 if the surviving spouse was married to the elected public officer for at least one year immediately preceding the death of the elected public officer. The benefits continue until the remarriage or death of the surviving spouse.”

Section 5, ch. 89, SLA 1988 provides: “Notwithstanding former AS 39.37.130 and 39.37.140, a former member of the Elected Public Officers Retirement System who received an involuntary refund of the individual’s account because of a levy may repay the amount levied together with accrued interest. Upon payment of the full amount owing, the former member regains all rights that were terminated because of the refund.”

Section 35, ch. 106, SLA 1988 provides:
“Notwithstanding former AS 39.37.060 and sec. 51, ch. 117, SLA 1986, the surviving spouse of an elected public officer who has retirement rights under the Elected Public Officers’ Retirement System is eligible to continue receiving survivors’ benefits upon remarriage.
If there is no surviving spouse or surviving dependent child entitled to benefits under former AS 39.37.060 or if, after payment of all survivors’ benefits due under former AS 39.37.060, less than the amount of contributions made by the elected public officer under former AS 39.37.070 and interest credited has been paid, the difference between the amount of contributions and the amount of benefits paid shall be paid to the designated beneficiary of the elected public officer.
If there is no designated beneficiary or if no designated beneficiary survives the elected public office, the balance of the contributions and interest credited shall be paid to the

“(1) surviving spouse; or, if there is none surviving,

“(2) surviving children in equal parts; or, if there is none surviving,

“(3) surviving parents in equal parts; or, if there is none surviving,

“(4) elected public officer’s estate.’’

Section 1, ch. 91, SLA 2001 reads as follows:

“Retirement benefits under elected public officers retirement system for certain benefit recipients. — (a) For a member of the elected public officers retirement system who has been receiving benefits under former AS 39.37.050(a)(1) for at least 10 years, if the monthly salary and, if appropriate, the additional allowances established under AS

24.10.110

, authorized for the office from which the member retired has not increased in at least 10 years, the monthly benefit payable to the member or the member’s survivor under former AS 39.37 (elected public officers retirement system) shall be increased as set out in this section. The amount of the increase is an amount equal to the monthly benefit to which the member or survivor is entitled multiplied by 75 percent of the percentage increase in the cost of living since the benefit was last adjusted under this section or former AS 39.37.050(a)(1) or since the member retired under former AS 39.37, whichever is later.

“(b) Notwithstanding former AS 39.37.050(a)(1), if a benefit is increased under (a) of this section and if the monthly salary and, if appropriate, the additional allowances established under AS

24.10.110

, authorized for the office from which a member retired is subsequently increased, the member’s or survivor’s benefit under former AS 39.37 may not be increased until the increase in benefits based on former AS 39.37.050(a)(1) equals or exceeds the increase based on (a) of this section. If benefits based on former AS 39.37.050(a)(1) increase to more than the increased benefit computed under (a) of this section, the member or survivor is entitled to receive an additional increase based on the difference between the two amounts.

“(c) The administrator of the public employees’ retirement system shall implement this section.

“(d) When computing a survivor’s benefit under former AS 39.37.060, adjustments granted to the deceased member or survivor under this section shall be included.

“(e) An increase in benefit payments under this section is effective July 1 of each calendar year and is based on the percentage increase in the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers for Anchorage, Alaska, during the previous calendar year, as determined by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.

“(f) In this section, ‘system’ means the elected public officers retirement system under former AS 39.37.”

Secs. 39.37.010 — 39.37.150.

Elected public officers retirement system. [Rejected at Referendum.]